Utah statutes.
75-1-104.   Severability.
If any provision of this code or the application thereof to any person or
circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other
provisions or applications of the code which can be given effect without the
invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this code
are declared to be severable.
